Maine, session 132, LD462.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §17760, sub-§3, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 693, §3, is
amended to read:
C. For purposes of this subsection, "federally recognized period of conflict" means
World War I, April 6, 1917 to November 11, 1918 or to March 31, 1920 if service was
in Russia; World War II, December 7, 1941 to December 31, 1946; the Korean
Conflict, June 27, 1950 to January 31, 1955; the Vietnam War, August 5, 1964 to May
7, 1975 and the period beginning on February 28, 1961 and ending on May 7, 1975 in
the case of a veteran who served in the Republic of Vietnam during that period;
operations in Lebanon, August 21, 1982 to February 26, 1984; operations in Grenada,
October 25, 1983 to December 15, 1983; and the Persian Gulf War, August 7, 1990 to
the date that the United States Government recognizes as the end of the Persian Gulf
War.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §18360, sub-§2, ¶E, as amended by PL 2007, c. 249, §29, is
further amended to read:
E. Except as provided in paragraph I, a member who served in the armed forces during
any federally recognized period of conflict, is entitled to service credit under this
subsection. For purposes of this paragraph, "federally recognized period of conflict"
means World War I, April 6, 1917 to November 11, 1918 or to March 31, 1920 if
service was in Russia; World War II, December 7, 1941 to December 31, 1946; the
Korean Conflict, June 27, 1950 to January 31, 1955; the Vietnam War, August 5, 1964
to May 7, 1975 and the period beginning on February 28, 1961 and ending on May 7,
1975 in the case of a veteran who served in the Republic of Vietnam during that period;
operations in Lebanon, August 21, 1982 to February 26, 1984; operations in Grenada,
October 25, 1983 to December 15, 1983; and the Persian Gulf War, August 7, 1990 to
the date that the United States Government recognizes as the end of the Persian Gulf
War.